Maryland, session 2025, HB1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 50 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 50. MARYLAND BROADBAND OPPORTUNITY AND FAIRNESS.
14–5001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “BROADBAND SERVICE” MEANS A MASS–MARKET RETAIL SERVICE
THAT PROVIDES THE CAPABILITY TO TRANSMIT DATA TO AND RECEIVE DATA FROM
ALL OR SUBSTANTIALLY ALL INTERNET ENDPOINTS, INCLUDING ANY CAPABILITIES
THAT ARE INCIDENTAL TO AND ENABLE THE OPERATION OF COMMUNICATIONS
SERVICES PROVIDED BY A WIRELINE, FIXED WIRELESS, MOBILE WIRELESS
BROADBAND, OR SATELLITE SERVICE PROVIDER.
(2) “BROADBAND SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE DIAL–UP SERVICE.
(C) “LOW–INCOME CONSUMER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE HOUSEHOLD
OR AT LEAST ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSEHOLD:

HOUSE BILL 1553 3
(1) MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR:
(I) FREE AND REDUCED PRICED MEAL PROGRAMS
ESTABLISHED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
(II) SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
BENEFITS; OR
(III) MEDICAID BENEFITS;
(2) IN THE PRIOR TAXABLE YEAR, MET THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA
FOR:
(I) THE MARYLAND EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT; OR
(II) THE CREDIT FOR THE ELDERLY AND THE PERMANENTLY
AND TOTALLY DISABLED UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 22;
(3) RECEIVES A BENEFIT THROUGH A LOW–INCOME ENERGY
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; OR
(4) HAS AN ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME AT OR BELOW 200% OF THE
FEDERAL POVERTY GUIDELINES.
(D) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF STATEWIDE BROADBAND IN THE
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS A LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PROGRAM.
(F) “PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT PROVIDES BROADBAND SERVICE.
14–5002.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, EACH PROVIDER IN THE STATE
SHALL ESTABLISH A LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PROGRAM.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PROGRAM SHALL OFFER BROADBAND SERVICE TO ELIGIBLE LOW–INCOME
CONSUMERS AT A PRICE NOT TO EXCEED:

HOUSE BILL 1553
(I) $15 PER MONTH, INCLUDING TAXES AND FEES, FOR A
MINIMUM BROADBAND SPEED OF 100 MEGABITS PER SECOND DOWNLOAD SPEED
AND 20 MEGABITS PER SECOND UPLOAD SPEED; OR
(II) $20 PER MONTH, INCLUDING TAXES AND FEES, FOR A
MINIMUM BROADBAND SPEED OF 200 MEGABITS PER SECOND DOWNLOAD SPEED
AND 20 MEGABITS PER SECOND UPLOAD SPEED.
(2) THE OFFICE MAY MODIFY THE DOWNLOAD AND UPLOAD SPEEDS
REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR AREAS OF THE STATE IN
WHICH SUCH SPEEDS ARE NOT REASONABLY PRACTICABLE.
(3) (I) A PROVIDER MAY, ONCE EVERY 3 YEARS, INCREASE THE
PRICE OF BROADBAND SERVICE PROVIDED UNDER THE PROVIDER’S PROGRAM BY
THE LESSER OF:
1. THE MOST RECENT CHANGE IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS; OR
2. NOT MORE THAN 2% PER YEAR.
(II) A PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST 30 DAYS’ NOTICE OF
A PRICE INCREASE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH TO CONSUMERS
CURRENTLY ENROLLED IN THE PROVIDER’S PROGRAM AND THE OFFICE BEFORE
INCREASING THE PRICE.
(C) A PROVIDER MAY NOT REQUIRE ENROLLMENT IN AN AUTOMATIC
PAYMENT PLAN AS A CRITERION FOR ELIGIBILITY IN A PROGRAM.
(D) A PROVIDER SHALL ALLOW CUSTOMERS ENROLLED IN THE PROVIDER’S
PROGRAM TO PURCHASE STANDALONE BROADBAND SERVICE, OR BROADBAND
SERVICE BUNDLED WITH CABLE TELEVISION OR PHONE SERVICE.
(E) ANY CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT FOR BROADBAND SERVICE OFFERED AS
PART OF A PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE THE SAME TERMS AND CONDITIONS, OTHER
THAN PRICE AND BROADBAND SPEED, AS REGULARLY PRICED PLANS FOR SIMILAR
SERVICES OFFERED BY THE PROVIDER.
(F) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL MAKE ALL COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE
EFFORTS TO PROMOTE AND ADVERTISE THE AVAILABILITY OF BROADBAND SERVICE
FOR LOW–INCOME CONSUMERS AND ENROLLMENT PROCEDURES ON THE
PROVIDER’S WEBSITE AND IN ANY WRITTEN OR COMMERCIAL PROMOTIONAL OR
ADVERTISING MATERIALS.

HOUSE BILL 1553 5
(2) ANY PROMOTION OR ADVERTISING REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE PROMINENT DISPLAY OF
THE PROVIDER’S PROGRAM.
14–5003.
THE OFFICE MAY EXEMPT A PROVIDER FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF §
14–5002 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF:
(1) THE PROVIDER PROVIDES BROADBAND SERVICE TO FEWER THAN
20,000 HOUSEHOLDS; AND
(2) THE OFFICE DETERMINES THAT COMPLIANCE WOULD RESULT IN
AN UNREASONABLE OR UNSUSTAINABLE FINANCIAL IMPACT ON THE PROVIDER.
14–5004.
(A) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 15, 2026, AND EACH NOVEMBER 15
THEREAFTER, A PROVIDER IN THE STATE SHALL FILE WITH THE OFFICE A
COMPLIANCE REPORT INCLUDING:
(1) THE AVAILABILITY OF A LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PROGRAM;
(2) THE NUMBER OF CONSUMERS ENROLLED IN THE PROGRAM;
(3) THE PROCEDURES USED TO VERIFY THE ELIGIBILITY OF
CUSTOMERS APPLYING FOR THE PROGRAM;
(4) THE ADVERTISING AND MARKETING EFFORTS UNDERTAKEN TO
ADVERTISE AND PROMOTE THE AVAILABILITY OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING
SAMPLES OF ADVERTISING AND MARKETING MATERIALS;
(5) ALL BROADBAND SERVICE PLANS OFFERED BY THE PROVIDER,
INCLUDING PRICING AND BROADBAND SPEEDS; AND
(6) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE OFFICE CONSIDERS NECESSARY
OR APPROPRIATE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND AT LEAST EVERY 5 YEARS
THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1553
(1) DETERMINE WHETHER THE MINIMUM BROADBAND DOWNLOAD
AND UPLOAD SPEEDS REQUIRED IN § 14–5002(B)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHOULD BE
INCREASED TO:
(I) THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION’S
BENCHMARK FOR HIGH–SPEED FIXED BROADBAND DOWNLOAD AND UPLOAD
SPEEDS; OR
(II) COMMONLY AVAILABLE MOBILE BROADBAND DOWNLOAD
AND UPLOAD SPEEDS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) (I) EVALUATE THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR A
LOW–INCOME CONSUMER; AND
(II) INCLUDE IN THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 6.5–104 OF
THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE ANY RECOMMENDATIONS
FOR CHANGES TO THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.
14–5005.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE AND IS
SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE
13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Housing and Community Development
6.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Statewide Broadband.
(c) “Office” means the Office of Statewide Broadband.
6.5–104.
(a) The Office shall:
(1) develop definitions and standards for broadband Internet that:
(i) address current and future requirements and uses by
communities, businesses, schools, health care providers, and other stakeholders;

HOUSE BILL 1553 7
(ii) reflect the need for a forward–looking, statewide digital
communications infrastructure; [and]
(iii) ARE CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 50 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(IV) are not at odds with definitions and standards adopted by the
Federal Communications Commission;
(2) (i) collect promotional and nonpromotional pricing data directly
from broadband Internet providers, INCLUDING DATA REQUIRED UNDER § 14–5004(A)
OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; and
(ii) assess the actual upload and download speeds experienced by
consumers;
(4) create a website that houses a publicly accessible map that allows users
to overlay GIS heat mapping comments, based on and incorporating data and information
from the Federal Communications Commission, that shows, in addition to any information
provided by the Federal Communications Commission:
(i) which residences do and do not have access to broadband
Internet;
(ii) broadband Internet service prices and plans available in
different areas, INCLUDING REDUCED RATE BROADBAND PLANS FOR LOW–INCOME
CONSUMERS; and
(iii) other available State geographic and demographic data;
(5) collect, analyze, and publicly share:
(i) geographic and demographic data regarding households that rely
on mobile broadband for Internet service, based on the understanding that mobile
broadband is not a substitute for in–home fixed Internet services;
(ii) data regarding the adoption and affordability of reliable
broadband Internet in the State, including the average cost per average speed by county;
[and]
(iii) data regarding investments in expanding Internet
infrastructure, adoption, and speed increases; AND
(IV) AVAILABLE BROADBAND PRODUCTS INCLUDING RETAIL
RATE PLANS AND LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PLANS;

HOUSE BILL 1553
(e) (1) On or before December 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the Office
shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly on:
(i) the progress of the State’s efforts to:
1. develop and implement the plan required under
subsection (c) of this section;
2. increase access and connection to broadband Internet
services throughout the State with specific reporting on improvements to infrastructure,
adoption, and speeds;
3. improve digital literacy among residents of the State; and
4. increase speeds to meet or exceed the Federal
Communications Commission standard for upload and download speeds;
(ii) the existing gaps in connectivity and the State’s progress toward
closing those gaps;
(iii) the impact that gaps in Internet service have on the workforce
and State and local economies;
(iv) information from local education agencies on the impact of
Internet service quality on student achievement and access to 21st century opportunities;
(v) demographic data on locations with gaps in services; and
(vi) the allocation of money from, and programs supported by, the
Digital Inclusion Fund, the Digital Connectivity Fund, and the Rural Broadband
Assistance Fund in the preceding fiscal year.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(I) MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–5004(B)(2)(II) OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(II) be published on the website established under subsection (a)(4)
of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.